Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,100
Credential; disciplinary action; revocation; effect.

If revocation is imposed pursuant to section 38-196, the credential holder shall not engage in the practice of the profession after a credential to practice such profession is revoked. Such revocation shall be for all times, except that at any time after the expiration of two years, application may be made for reinstatement pursuant to section 38-148.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 100.